Indiana, session 2026, HB1187.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-12-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 31, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 13. (a) Except as
provided in section 40.5 of this chapter, an individual may have
twenty-four thousand nine hundred sixty dollars ($24,960) deducted
from the assessed value of the taxable tangible property that the
individual owns, or real property, a mobile home not assessed as real
property, or a manufactured home not assessed as real property that the
individual is buying under a contract that provides that the individual
is to pay property taxes on the real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home, if the contract or a memorandum of the contract
is recorded in the county recorder's office and if:
(1) the individual served in the military or naval forces of the
United States during any of its wars;
(2) the individual received an honorable discharge;
(3) the individual has a disability with a service connected
disability of ten percent (10%) or more;
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


(4) the individual's disability is evidenced by:
(A) a pension certificate, an award of compensation, or a
disability compensation check issued by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(B) a certificate of eligibility issued to the individual by the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs after the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs has determined that the
individual's disability qualifies the individual to receive a
deduction under this section; and
(5) the individual:
(A) owns the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home; or
(B) is buying the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home under contract;
on the date the statement required by section 15 of this chapter is
filed.
(b) The surviving spouse of an individual may receive the deduction
provided by this section if the individual satisfied the requirements of
subsection (a)(1) through (a)(4) at the time of death and the surviving
spouse satisfies the requirement of subsection (a)(5) at the time the
deduction statement is filed. The surviving spouse is entitled to the
deduction regardless of whether the property for which the deduction
is claimed was owned by the deceased veteran or the surviving spouse
before the deceased veteran's death.
(c) One who receives the deduction provided by this section may not
receive the deduction provided by section 16 of this chapter. However,
the individual may receive any other property tax deduction which the
individual is entitled to by law.
(d) An individual who has sold real property, a mobile home not
assessed as real property, or a manufactured home not assessed as real
property to another person under a contract that provides that the
contract buyer is to pay the property taxes on the real property, mobile
home, or manufactured home may not claim the deduction provided
under this section against that real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home.
(e) This section applies only to property taxes imposed for an
assessment date before January 1, 2026.
(f) This section expires January 1, 2028.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-12-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 14. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (c) and except as provided in section 40.5 of
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


this chapter, an individual may have the sum of fourteen thousand
dollars ($14,000) one hundred percent (100%) of the assessed value
deducted from the assessed value of the real property, mobile home not
assessed as real property, or manufactured home not assessed as real
property that the individual owns (or the real property, mobile home
not assessed as real property, or manufactured home not assessed as
real property that the individual is buying under a contract that
provides that the individual is to pay property taxes on the real
property, mobile home, or manufactured home if the contract or a
memorandum of the contract is recorded in the county recorder's office)
if:
(1) the individual served in the military or naval forces of the
United States for at least ninety (90) days;
(2) the individual received an honorable discharge;
(3) the individual either:
(A) has a total disability; or
(B) is at least sixty-two (62) years old; and has a disability of
at least ten percent (10%);
(4) the individual's disability is evidenced by:
(A) a pension certificate or an award of compensation issued
by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(B) a certificate of eligibility issued to the individual by the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs after the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs has determined that the
individual's disability qualifies the individual to receive a
deduction under this section; and
(5) the individual:
(A) owns the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home; or
(B) is buying the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home under contract;
on the date the statement required by section 15 of this chapter is
filed.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), the surviving
spouse of an individual may receive the deduction provided by this
section if:
(1) the individual satisfied the requirements of subsection (a)(1)
through (a)(4) at the time of death; or
(2) the individual:
(A) was killed in action;
(B) died while serving on active duty in the military or naval
forces of the United States; or
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


(C) died while performing inactive duty training in the military
or naval forces of the United States; and
the surviving spouse satisfies the requirement of subsection (a)(5) at
the time the deduction statement is filed. The surviving spouse is
entitled to the deduction regardless of whether the property for which
the deduction is claimed was owned by the deceased veteran or the
surviving spouse before the deceased veteran's death.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (f), no one is entitled to the
deduction provided by this section if the assessed value of the
individual's Indiana real property, Indiana mobile home not assessed as
real property, and Indiana manufactured home not assessed as real
property, as shown by the tax duplicate, exceeds the assessed value
limit specified in subsection (d).
(d) Except as provided in subsection (f), for the:
(1) January 1, 2017, January 1, 2018, and January 1, 2019,
assessment dates, the assessed value limit for purposes of
subsection (c) is one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000);
(2) January 1, 2020, January 1, 2021, January 1, 2022, and
January 1, 2023, assessment dates, the assessed value limit for
purposes of subsection (c) is two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000); and
(3) January 1, 2024, assessment date and for each assessment date
thereafter, the assessed value limit for purposes of subsection (c)
is two hundred forty thousand dollars ($240,000).
(e) An individual who has sold real property, a mobile home not
assessed as real property, or a manufactured home not assessed as real
property to another person under a contract that provides that the
contract buyer is to pay the property taxes on the real property, mobile
home, or manufactured home may not claim the deduction provided
under this section against that real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home.
(f) For purposes of determining the assessed value of the real
property, mobile home, or manufactured home under subsection (d) for
an individual who has received a deduction under this section in a
previous year, increases in assessed value that occur after the later of:
(1) December 31, 2019; or
(2) the first year that the individual has received the deduction;
are not considered unless the increase in assessed value is attributable
to substantial renovation or new improvements. Where there is an
increase in assessed value for purposes of the deduction under this
section, the assessor shall provide a report to the county auditor
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


describing the substantial renovation or new improvements, if any, that
were made to the property prior to the increase in assessed value.
SECTION 3. IC 6-1.1-12-14.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 33, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 14.5. (a) As used in this
section, "homestead" has the meaning set forth in section 37 of this
chapter.
(b) An individual may claim a deduction from the assessed value of
the individual's homestead if:
(1) the individual served in the military or naval forces of the
United States for at least ninety (90) days;
(2) the individual received an honorable discharge;
(3) the individual has a disability of at least fifty percent (50%);
(4) the individual's disability is evidenced by:
(A) a pension certificate or an award of compensation issued
by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(B) a certificate of eligibility issued to the individual by the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs after the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs has determined that the
individual's disability qualifies the individual to receive a
deduction under this section; and
(5) the homestead was conveyed without charge to the individual
who is the owner of the homestead by an organization that is
exempt from income taxation under the federal Internal Revenue
Code.
(c) If an individual is entitled to a deduction from assessed value
under subsection (b) for the individual's homestead, the amount of the
deduction is determined as follows:
(1) If the individual is totally disabled, the deduction is equal to
one hundred percent (100%) of the assessed value of the
homestead.
(2) If the individual has a disability of at least ninety percent
(90%) but the individual is not totally disabled, the deduction is
equal to ninety percent (90%) of the assessed value of the
homestead.
(3) If the individual has a disability of at least eighty percent
(80%) but less than ninety percent (90%), the deduction is equal
to eighty percent (80%) of the assessed value of the homestead.
(4) If the individual has a disability of at least seventy percent
(70%) but less than eighty percent (80%), the deduction is equal
to seventy percent (70%) of the assessed value of the homestead.
(5) If the individual has a disability of at least sixty percent (60%)
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


but less than seventy percent (70%), the deduction is equal to
sixty percent (60%) of the assessed value of the homestead.
(6) If the individual has a disability of at least fifty percent (50%)
but less than sixty percent (60%), the deduction is equal to fifty
percent (50%) of the assessed value of the homestead.
(d) An individual who claims a deduction under this section for an
assessment date may not also claim a deduction under section 13
(before its expiration) or 14 of this chapter for that same assessment
date.
(e) An individual who desires to claim the deduction under this
section must claim the deduction in the manner specified by the
department of local government finance.
SECTION 4. IC 6-1.1-12-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 15. (a) Except as
provided in section 17.8 of this chapter and subject to section 45 of this
chapter, an individual who desires to claim the deduction provided by
section 13 or 14 of this chapter must file a statement with the auditor
of the county in which the individual resides. To obtain the deduction
for a desired calendar year in which property taxes are first due and
payable, the statement must be completed, dated, and filed with the
county auditor on or before January 15 of the calendar year in which
the property taxes are first due and payable. The statement may be filed
in person or by mail. If mailed, the mailing must be postmarked on or
before the last day for filing. The statement shall contain a sworn
declaration that the individual is entitled to the deduction.
(b) In addition to the statement, the individual shall submit to the
county auditor for the auditor's inspection:
(1) a pension certificate, an award of compensation, or a disability
compensation check issued by the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs if the individual claims the deduction provided
by section 13 of this chapter;
(2) (1) a pension certificate or an award of compensation issued
by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs if the
individual claims the deduction provided by section 14 of this
chapter; or
(3) (2) the appropriate certificate of eligibility issued to the
individual by the Indiana department of veterans' affairs if the
individual claims the deduction provided by section 13 or 14 of
this chapter.
(c) If the individual claiming the deduction is under guardianship,
the guardian shall file the statement required by this section. If a
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


deceased veteran's surviving spouse is claiming the deduction, the
surviving spouse shall provide the documentation necessary to
establish that at the time of death the deceased veteran satisfied the
requirements of section 13(a)(1) through 13(a)(4) of this chapter,
section 14(a)(1) through 14(a)(4) of this chapter or section 14(b)(2) of
this chapter, whichever applies.
(d) If the individual claiming a deduction under section 13 or 14 of
this chapter is buying real property, a mobile home not assessed as real
property, or a manufactured home not assessed as real property under
a contract that provides that the individual is to pay property taxes for
the real estate, mobile home, or manufactured home, the statement
required by this section must contain the record number and page
where the contract or memorandum of the contract is recorded.
SECTION 5. IC 6-1.1-12-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 16. (a) Except as
provided in section 40.5 of this chapter, a surviving spouse may have
the sum of eighteen thousand seven hundred twenty dollars ($18,720)
deducted from the assessed value of the surviving spouse's tangible
property, or real property, mobile home not assessed as real property,
or manufactured home not assessed as real property that the surviving
spouse is buying under a contract that provides that the surviving
spouse is to pay property taxes on the real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home, if the contract or a memorandum of the contract
is recorded in the county recorder's office, and if:
(1) the deceased spouse served in the military or naval forces of
the United States before November 12, 1918;
(2) the deceased spouse received an honorable discharge; and
(3) the surviving spouse:
(A) owns the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home; or
(B) is buying the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home under contract;
on the date the statement required by section 17 of this chapter is
filed.
(b) A surviving spouse who receives the deduction provided by this
section may not receive the deduction provided by section 13 (before
its expiration) of this chapter. However, the surviving spouse may
receive any other deduction which the surviving spouse is entitled to
by law.
(c) An individual who has sold real property, a mobile home not
assessed as real property, or a manufactured home not assessed as real
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


property to another person under a contract that provides that the
contract buyer is to pay the property taxes on the real property, mobile
home, or manufactured home may not claim the deduction provided
under this section against that real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home.
(d) This section applies only to property taxes imposed for an
assessment date before January 1, 2025.
(e) This section expires January 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. IC 6-1.1-12-17.8, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 17.8. (a) An individual
who receives a deduction provided under section 9 (before its
expiration), 11 (before its expiration), 13 (before its expiration), 14,
16 (before its expiration), 17.4 (before its expiration), or 37 of this
chapter in a particular year and who remains eligible for the deduction
in the following year is not required to file a statement to apply for the
deduction in the following year. However, for purposes of a deduction
under section 37 of this chapter, the county auditor may, in the county
auditor's discretion, terminate the deduction for assessment dates after
January 15, 2012, if the individual does not comply with the
requirement in IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January 1, 2015), as
determined by the county auditor, before January 1, 2013. Before the
county auditor terminates the deduction because the taxpayer claiming
the deduction did not comply with the requirement in
IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January 1, 2015) before January 1, 2013,
the county auditor shall mail notice of the proposed termination of the
deduction to:
(1) the last known address of each person liable for any property
taxes or special assessment, as shown on the tax duplicate or
special assessment records; or
(2) the last known address of the most recent owner shown in the
transfer book.
(b) An individual who receives a deduction provided under section
9 (before its expiration), 11 (before its expiration), 13 (before its
expiration), 14, 16 (before its expiration), or 17.4 (before its
expiration) of this chapter in a particular year and who becomes
ineligible for the deduction in the following year shall notify the auditor
of the county in which the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home for which the individual claims the deduction is located of the
individual's ineligibility in the year in which the individual becomes
ineligible. An individual who becomes ineligible for a deduction under
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


section 37 of this chapter shall notify the county auditor of the county
in which the property is located in conformity with section 37 of this
chapter.
(c) The auditor of each county shall, in a particular year, apply a
deduction provided under section 9 (before its expiration), 11 (before
its expiration), 13 (before its expiration), 14, 16 (before its
expiration), 17.4 (before its expiration), or 37 of this chapter to each
individual who received the deduction in the preceding year unless the
auditor determines that the individual is no longer eligible for the
deduction.
(d) An individual who receives a deduction provided under section
9 (before its expiration), 11 (before its expiration), 13 (before its
expiration), 14, 16 (before its expiration), 17.4 (before its expiration),
or 37 of this chapter for property that is jointly held with another owner
in a particular year and remains eligible for the deduction in the
following year is not required to file a statement to reapply for the
deduction following the removal of the joint owner if:
(1) the individual is the sole owner of the property following the
death of the individual's spouse; or
(2) the individual is the sole owner of the property following the
death of a joint owner who was not the individual's spouse.
If a county auditor terminates a deduction under section 9 of this
chapter (before its expiration), a deduction under section 37 of this
chapter, or a credit under IC 6-1.1-20.6-8.5 after June 30, 2017, and
before May 1, 2019, because the taxpayer claiming the deduction or
credit did not comply with a requirement added to this subsection by
P.L.255-2017 to reapply for the deduction or credit, the county auditor
shall reinstate the deduction or credit if the taxpayer provides proof that
the taxpayer is eligible for the deduction or credit and is not claiming
the deduction or credit for any other property.
(e) A trust entitled to a deduction under section 9 (before its
expiration), 11 (before its expiration), 13 (before its expiration), 14,
16 (before its expiration), 17.4 (before its expiration), or 37 of this
chapter for real property owned by the trust and occupied by an
individual in accordance with section 17.9 of this chapter (before its
expiration) is not required to file a statement to apply for the deduction,
if:
(1) the individual who occupies the real property receives a
deduction provided under section 9 (before its expiration), 11
(before its expiration), 13 (before its expiration), 14, 16 (before
its expiration), 17.4 (before its expiration), or 37 of this chapter
in a particular year; and
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


(2) the trust remains eligible for the deduction in the following
year.
However, for purposes of a deduction under section 37 of this chapter,
the individuals that qualify the trust for a deduction must comply with
the requirement in IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January 1, 2015)
before January 1, 2013.
(f) A cooperative housing corporation (as defined in 26 U.S.C. 216)
that is entitled to a deduction under section 37 of this chapter in the
immediately preceding calendar year for a homestead (as defined in
section 37 of this chapter) is not required to file a statement to apply for
the deduction for the current calendar year if the cooperative housing
corporation remains eligible for the deduction for the current calendar
year. However, the county auditor may, in the county auditor's
discretion, terminate the deduction for assessment dates after January
15, 2012, if the individual does not comply with the requirement in
IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January 1, 2015), as determined by the
county auditor, before January 1, 2013. Before the county auditor
terminates a deduction because the taxpayer claiming the deduction did
not comply with the requirement in IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired
January 1, 2015) before January 1, 2013, the county auditor shall mail
notice of the proposed termination of the deduction to:
(1) the last known address of each person liable for any property
taxes or special assessment, as shown on the tax duplicate or
special assessment records; or
(2) the last known address of the most recent owner shown in the
transfer book.
(g) An individual who:
(1) was eligible for a homestead credit under IC 6-1.1-20.9
(repealed) for property taxes imposed for the March 1, 2007, or
January 15, 2008, assessment date; or
(2) would have been eligible for a homestead credit under
IC 6-1.1-20.9 (repealed) for property taxes imposed for the March
1, 2008, or January 15, 2009, assessment date if IC 6-1.1-20.9 had
not been repealed;
is not required to file a statement to apply for a deduction under section
37 of this chapter if the individual remains eligible for the deduction in
the current year. An individual who filed for a homestead credit under
IC 6-1.1-20.9 (repealed) for an assessment date after March 1, 2007 (if
the property is real property), or after January 1, 2008 (if the property
is personal property), shall be treated as an individual who has filed for
a deduction under section 37 of this chapter. However, the county
auditor may, in the county auditor's discretion, terminate the deduction
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


for assessment dates after January 15, 2012, if the individual does not
comply with the requirement in IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January
1, 2015), as determined by the county auditor, before January 1, 2013.
Before the county auditor terminates the deduction because the
taxpayer claiming the deduction did not comply with the requirement
in IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January 1, 2015) before January 1,
2013, the county auditor shall mail notice of the proposed termination
of the deduction to the last known address of each person liable for any
property taxes or special assessment, as shown on the tax duplicate or
special assessment records, or to the last known address of the most
recent owner shown in the transfer book.
(h) If a county auditor terminates a deduction because the taxpayer
claiming the deduction did not comply with the requirement in
IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January 1, 2015) before January 1, 2013,
the county auditor shall reinstate the deduction if the taxpayer provides
proof that the taxpayer is eligible for the deduction and is not claiming
the deduction for any other property.
(i) A taxpayer described in section 37(r) of this chapter is not
required to file a statement to apply for the deduction provided by
section 37 of this chapter if the property owned by the taxpayer remains
eligible for the deduction for that calendar year.
SECTION 7. IC 6-1.1-12-17.9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 17.9. A trust is entitled
to a deduction under section 9 (before its expiration), 11 (before its
expiration), 13 (before its expiration), 14, 16 (before its expiration),
or 17.4 (before its expiration) of this chapter for real property owned
by the trust and occupied by an individual if the county auditor
determines that the individual:
(1) upon verification in the body of the deed or otherwise, has
either:
(A) a beneficial interest in the trust; or
(B) the right to occupy the real property rent free under the
terms of a qualified personal residence trust created by the
individual under United States Treasury Regulation
25.2702-5(c)(2); and
(2) otherwise qualifies for the deduction.
SECTION 8. IC 6-1.1-12-43, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 37, AND AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025, SECTION
292, AND AS AMENDED BY THE TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS
BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IS CORRECTED AND
AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 43. (a) For purposes of this section:
(1) "benefit" refers to a deduction under section 9 (before its
expiration), 11 (before its expiration), 13 (before its expiration),
14, (before its expiration), 16 (before its expiration), 17.4 (before
its expiration), 26 (before its expiration), 29 (before its
expiration), 33 (before its expiration), 34 (before its expiration),
37, or 37.5 of this chapter;
(2) "closing agent" means a person that closes a transaction;
(3) "customer" means an individual who obtains a loan in a
transaction; and
(4) "transaction" means a single family residential:
(A) first lien purchase money mortgage transaction; or
(B) refinancing transaction.
(b) Before closing a transaction after December 31, 2004, a closing
agent must provide to the customer the form referred to in subsection
(c).
(c) Before June 1, 2004, The department of local government
finance shall prescribe the form to be provided by closing agents to
customers under subsection (b). The department shall make the form
available to closing agents, county assessors, county auditors, and
county treasurers in hard copy and electronic form. County assessors,
county auditors, and county treasurers shall make the form available to
the general public. The form must:
(1) on one (1) side:
(A) list each benefit; and
(B) list the eligibility criteria for each benefit;
(2) on the other side indicate:
(A) each action by and each type of documentation from the
customer required to file for each benefit; and
(B) sufficient instructions and information to permit a party to
terminate a standard deduction under section 37 of this chapter
on any property on which the party or the spouse of the party
will no longer be eligible for the standard deduction under
section 37 of this chapter after the party or the party's spouse
begins to reside at the property that is the subject of the
closing, including an explanation of the tax consequences and
applicable penalties, if a party unlawfully claims a standard
deduction under section 37 of this chapter; and
(3) be printed in one (1) of two (2) or more colors prescribed by
the department of local government finance that distinguish the
form from other documents typically used in a closing referred to
in subsection (b).
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


(d) A closing agent:
(1) may reproduce the form referred to in subsection (c);
(2) in reproducing the form, must use a print color prescribed by
the department of local government finance; and
(3) is not responsible for the content of the form referred to in
subsection (c) and shall be held harmless by the department of
local government finance from any liability for the content of the
form.
(e) This subsection applies to a transaction that is closed after
December 31, 2009. In addition to providing the customer the form
described in subsection (c) before closing the transaction, a closing
agent shall do the following as soon as possible after the closing, and
within the time prescribed by the department of insurance under
IC 27-7-3-15.5:
(1) To the extent determinable, input the information described in
IC 27-7-3-15.5(c)(2) into the system maintained by the
department of insurance under IC 27-7-3-15.5.
(2) Submit the form described in IC 27-7-3-15.5(c) to the data
base described in IC 27-7-3-15.5(c)(2)(D).
(f) A closing agent to which this section applies shall document the
closing agent's compliance with this section with respect to each
transaction in the form of verification of compliance signed by the
customer.
(g) Subject to IC 27-7-3-15.5(d), a closing agent is subject to a civil
penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each instance in which the
closing agent fails to comply with this section with respect to a
customer. The penalty:
(1) may be enforced by the state agency that has administrative
jurisdiction over the closing agent in the same manner that the
agency enforces the payment of fees or other penalties payable to
the agency; and
(2) shall be paid into:
(A) the state general fund, if the closing agent fails to comply
with subsection (b); or
(B) the home ownership education account established by
IC 5-20-1-27, if the closing agent fails to comply with
subsection (e) in a transaction that is closed after December
31, 2009.
(h) A closing agent is not liable for any other damages claimed by
a customer because of:
(1) the closing agent's mere failure to provide the appropriate
document to the customer under subsection (b); or
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


(2) with respect to a transaction that is closed after December 31,
2009, the closing agent's failure to input the information or
submit the form described in subsection (e).
(i) The state agency that has administrative jurisdiction over a
closing agent shall:
(1) examine the closing agent to determine compliance with this
section; and
(2) impose and collect penalties under subsection (g).
SECTION 9. IC 6-1.1-12-46, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 46. (a) This section
applies to real property for an assessment date in 2011 or a later year
if:
(1) the real property is not exempt from property taxation for the
assessment date;
(2) title to the real property is transferred after the assessment date
and on or before the December 31 that next succeeds the
assessment date;
(3) the transferee of the real property applies for an exemption
under IC 6-1.1-11 for the next succeeding assessment date; and
(4) the county property tax assessment board of appeals
determines that the real property is exempt from property taxation
for that next succeeding assessment date.
(b) For the assessment date referred to in subsection (a)(1), real
property is eligible for any deductions for which the transferor under
subsection (a)(2) was eligible for that assessment date under the
following:
(1) IC 6-1.1-12-1 (before its repeal).
(2) IC 6-1.1-12-9 (before its expiration).
(3) IC 6-1.1-12-11 (before its expiration).
(4) IC 6-1.1-12-13 (before its expiration).
(5) IC 6-1.1-12-14.
(6) IC 6-1.1-12-16 (before its expiration).
(7) IC 6-1.1-12-17.4 (before its expiration).
(8) IC 6-1.1-12-18 (before its expiration).
(9) IC 6-1.1-12-22 (before its expiration).
(10) IC 6-1.1-12-37.
(11) IC 6-1.1-12-37.5.
(c) For the payment date applicable to the assessment date referred
to in subsection (a)(1), real property is eligible for the credit for
excessive residential property taxes under IC 6-1.1-20.6 for which the
transferor under subsection (a)(2) would be eligible for that payment
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


date if the transfer had not occurred.
SECTION 10. IC 6-1.1-22-19, AS ADDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 50, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 19. (a) This section
applies to real property tax statements provided to taxpayers after
December 31, 2025.
(b) In a manner determined by the department of local government
finance, the department of local government finance shall include on
the coupon page of the property tax statement prescribed by the
department of local government finance educational information
regarding the eligibility and procedures for the following deductions
and credit credits available to certain eligible taxpayers:
(1) The deduction for a veteran with a partial disability under
IC 6-1.1-12-13 (before its expiration).
(2) The deduction for a totally disabled veteran or a veteran who
is at least sixty-two (62) years of age who is partially disabled
under IC 6-1.1-12-14.
(3) The deduction for a disabled veteran under IC 6-1.1-12-14.5.
(4) The credit for a person sixty-five (65) years of age or older
under IC 6-1.1-51.3-1.
(5) The credit for a disabled veteran or a veteran who is at
least sixty-two (62) years of age under IC 6-1.1-51.3-5.
(6) The credit for a veteran with a partial disability under
IC 6-1.1-51.3-6.
SECTION 11. IC 6-1.1-37-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 4. A person who makes
a false statement, with intent to obtain the property tax deduction
provided in either IC 6-1.1-12-13 (before its expiration) or
IC 6-1.1-12-14 when the person is not entitled to the deduction,
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 12. IC 6-1.1-51.3-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 5. (a) An
individual is entitled to a credit against local property taxes
imposed on the individual's real property, or mobile home or
manufactured home within the county, if:
(1) the individual served in the military or naval forces of the
United States for at least ninety (90) days;
(2) the individual received an honorable discharge;
(3) the individual is at least sixty-two (62) years of age and has
a disability of at least ten percent (10%);
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


(4) the individual's disability is evidenced by:
(A) a pension certificate or an award of compensation
issued by the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs; or
(B) a certificate of eligibility issued to the individual by the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs after the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs has determined that the
individual's disability qualifies the individual to receive a
credit under this section; and
(5) the individual:
(A) owns the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home; or
(B) is buying the real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home under contract;
on the date the credit is claimed, and in the case of clause (B),
the contract or a memorandum of the contract is recorded in
the county recorder's office.
(b) The amount of the credit is equal to three hundred dollars
($300).
(c) The surviving spouse of an individual may receive the credit
provided by this section if:
(1) the individual satisfied the requirements of subsection
(a)(1) through (a)(4) at the time of death; or
(2) the individual:
(A) was killed in action;
(B) died while serving on active duty in the military or
naval forces of the United States; or
(C) died while performing inactive duty training in the
military or naval forces of the United States;
and the surviving spouse satisfies the requirement of subsection
(a)(5) at the time the credit is claimed. The surviving spouse is
entitled to the credit regardless of whether the property for which
the credit is claimed was owned by the deceased veteran or the
surviving spouse before the deceased veteran's death.
(d) An individual who receives the credit provided by this
section may not receive the credit provided by section 1 of this
chapter. However, the individual may receive any other property
tax credit that the individual is entitled to by law.
(e) An individual who has sold real property or a mobile home
or manufactured home to another person under a contract that
provides that the contract buyer is to pay the property taxes on the
real property, mobile home, or manufactured home may not claim
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


the credit provided under this section against that real property,
mobile home, or manufactured home.
(f) An individual wishing to claim a credit under this section
must file a statement, on forms prescribed by the department of
local government finance, with the county auditor and provide
documentation necessary to substantiate the individual's eligibility
for the credit. The statement must be completed and dated on or
before January 15 of the calendar year in which the property taxes
are first due and payable. The statement may be filed in person or
by mail. If mailed, the mailing must be postmarked on or before
the last day for filing. An individual who remains eligible for the
credit in the following year is not required to file a statement to
apply for the credit in the following year. However, an individual
who receives a credit under this section in a particular year and
who becomes ineligible for the credit in the following year shall
notify the auditor of the county in which the homestead is located
of the individual's ineligibility not later than sixty (60) days after
the individual becomes ineligible.
SECTION 13. IC 6-1.1-51.3-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 6. (a) An
individual is entitled to a credit against local property taxes
imposed on the individual's real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home within the county, if:
(1) the individual served in the military or naval forces of the
United States during any of its wars;
(2) the individual received an honorable discharge;
(3) the individual has a disability with a service connected
disability of ten percent (10%) or more;
(4) the individual's disability is evidenced by:
(A) a pension certificate, an award of compensation, or a
disability compensation check issued by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(B) a certificate of eligibility issued to the individual by the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs after the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs has determined that the
individual's disability qualifies the individual to receive a
credit under this section; and
(5) the individual:
(A) owns the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home; or
(B) is buying the real property, mobile home, or
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


manufactured home under contract;
on the date the credit is claimed, and in the case of clause (B),
the contract or a memorandum of the contract is recorded in
the county recorder's office.
(b) The amount of the credit is equal to four hundred dollars
($400).
(c) The surviving spouse of an individual may receive the credit
provided by this section if the individual satisfied the requirements
of subsection (a)(1) through (a)(4) at the time of death and the
surviving spouse satisfies the requirement of subsection (a)(5) at
the time the credit is claimed. The surviving spouse is entitled to
the credit regardless of whether the property for which the credit
is claimed was owned by the deceased veteran or the surviving
spouse before the deceased veteran's death.
(d) An individual who receives the credit provided by this
section may not receive the credit provided by section 1 of this
chapter. However, the individual may receive any other property
tax credit that the individual is entitled to by law.
(e) An individual who has sold real property or a mobile home
or manufactured home to another person under a contract that
provides that the contract buyer is to pay the property taxes on the
real property, mobile home, or manufactured home may not claim
the credit provided under this section against that real property,
mobile home, or manufactured home.
(f) An individual wishing to claim a credit under this section
must file a statement, on forms prescribed by the department of
local government finance, with the county auditor and provide
documentation necessary to substantiate the individual's eligibility
for the credit. The statement must be completed and dated on or
before January 15 of the calendar year in which the property taxes
are first due and payable. The statement may be filed in person or
by mail. If mailed, the mailing must be postmarked on or before
the last day for filing. An individual who remains eligible for the
credit in the following year is not required to file a statement to
apply for the credit in the following year. However, an individual
who receives a credit under this section in a particular year and
who becomes ineligible for the credit in the following year shall
notify the auditor of the county in which the homestead is located
of the individual's ineligibility not later than sixty (60) days after
the individual becomes ineligible.
SECTION 14. IC 6-1.1-53 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]:
Chapter 53. Maximum Property Tax Liability Credit for
Certain Veterans
Sec. 1. This chapter applies only to property taxes imposed for
assessment dates after December 31, 2025, and before January 1,
2033.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "qualified individual" means an
individual who:
(1) received a property tax deduction for the January 1, 2025,
assessment date under IC 6-1.1-12-13 (before its expiration);
and
(2) is entitled to and is claiming a property tax credit for the
current assessment date under:
(A) IC 6-1.1-51.3-5; or
(B) IC 6-1.1-51.3-6.
Sec. 3. For each assessment date, each county auditor shall
determine the following with respect to each qualified individual
on whose real property, or mobile home or manufactured home
within the county, property taxes will be imposed in the county:
(1) The qualified individual's net property tax liability for the
assessment date before application of any credit under this
chapter.
(2) The qualified individual's net property tax liability for the
assessment date before application of any credit under this
chapter and calculated as if:
(A) the applicable property tax credit described in section
2(2) of this chapter, and the corresponding credit amount,
were not in effect; and
(B) the property tax deduction described in section 2(1) of
this chapter that the qualified individual received for the
January 1, 2025, assessment date, and the corresponding
deduction amount, remain in effect.
Sec. 4. A qualified individual is entitled to a credit against local
property taxes imposed for an assessment date on the qualified
individual's real property, or mobile home or manufactured home
within the county, in an amount equal to the greater of:
(1) zero (0); or
(2) the result of:
(A) the amount determined under section 3(1) of this
chapter; minus
(B) the amount determined under section 3(2) of this
chapter.
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


Sec. 5. A credit under this chapter is in addition to a property
tax credit applied under IC 6-1.1-51.3 and shall be applied to a
qualified individual's property tax liability for the year in the
manner set forth in IC 6-1.1-51.3-0.5.
Sec. 6. A qualified individual is not required to file an
application for the credit under this chapter.
SECTION 15. IC 6-6-5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 87, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 5. A person that owns a
vehicle and that is entitled to a property tax deduction under
IC 6-1.1-12-13 (before its expiration), IC 6-1.1-12-14, or
IC 6-1.1-12-16 (before its expiration) is entitled to a credit against the
vehicle excise tax as follows: Any remaining deduction from assessed
valuation to which the person is entitled, applicable to property taxes
payable in the year in which the excise tax imposed by this chapter is
due, after allowance of the deduction on real estate and personal
property owned by the person, shall reduce the vehicle excise tax in the
amount of two dollars ($2) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of
taxable value or major portion thereof. The county auditor shall, upon
request, furnish a certified statement to the person verifying the credit
allowable under this section, and the statement shall be presented to
and retained by the bureau to support the credit.
SECTION 16. IC 6-6-5-5.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 88, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 5.2. (a) This section
applies to a registration year beginning after December 31, 2013.
(b) Subject to subsection (d), an individual may claim a credit
against the tax imposed by this chapter upon a vehicle owned by the
individual if the individual is eligible for the credit under any of the
following:
(1) The individual meets all the following requirements:
(A) The individual served in the military or naval forces of the
United States during any of its wars.
(B) The individual received an honorable discharge.
(C) The individual has a disability with a service connected
disability of ten percent (10%) or more.
(D) The individual's disability is evidenced by:
(i) a pension certificate, an award of compensation, or a
disability compensation check issued by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(ii) a certificate of eligibility issued to the individual by the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs after the Indiana
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


department of veterans' affairs has determined that the
individual's disability qualifies the individual to receive a
credit under this section.
(E) The individual does not own property to which a property
tax deduction may be applied under IC 6-1.1-12-13 (before its
expiration).
(2) The individual meets all the following requirements:
(A) The individual served in the military or naval forces of the
United States for at least ninety (90) days.
(B) The individual received an honorable discharge.
(C) The individual either:
(i) has a total disability; or
(ii) is at least sixty-two (62) years of age and has a disability
of at least ten percent (10%).
(D) The individual's disability is evidenced by:
(i) a pension certificate or an award of compensation issued
by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(ii) a certificate of eligibility issued to the individual by the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs after the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs has determined that the
individual's disability qualifies the individual to receive a
credit under this section.
(E) The individual does not own property to which a property
tax deduction may be applied under IC 6-1.1-12-14.
(3) The individual meets both of the following requirements:
(A) The individual is the surviving spouse of any of the
following:
(i) An individual who would have been eligible for a credit
under this section if the individual had been alive in 2013
and this section had been in effect in 2013.
(ii) An individual who received a credit under this section in
the previous calendar year.
(iii) A World War I veteran.
(B) The individual does not own property to which a property
tax deduction may be applied under IC 6-1.1-12-13 (before its
expiration), IC 6-1.1-12-14, or IC 6-1.1-12-16 (before its
expiration).
(c) The amount of the credit that may be claimed under this section
is equal to the lesser of the following:
(1) The amount of the excise tax liability for the individual's
vehicle as determined under section 3 or 3.5 of this chapter, as
applicable.
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


(2) Seventy dollars ($70).
(d) The maximum number of motor vehicles for which an individual
may claim a credit under this section is two (2).
(e) An individual may not claim a credit under both:
(1) this section; and
(2) section 5 of this chapter.
(f) The credit allowed by this section must be claimed on a form
prescribed by the bureau. An individual claiming the credit must attach
to the form an affidavit from the county auditor stating that the
claimant does not own property to which a property tax deduction may
be applied under IC 6-1.1-12-13 (before its expiration),
IC 6-1.1-12-14, or IC 6-1.1-12-16 (before its expiration).
SECTION 17. IC 6-6-6.5-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 89, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 13. (a) As the basis for
measuring the tax imposed by this chapter, the department shall
classify every taxable aircraft in its proper class according to the
following classification plan:
CLASS DESCRIPTION
A Piston-driven
B Piston-driven,
and Pressurized
C Turbine driven
or other Powered
D Homebuilt, Gliders, or
Hot Air Balloons
(b) The tax imposed under this chapter is based on the age, class,
and maximum landing weight of the taxable aircraft. The amount of tax
imposed on the taxable aircraft is based on the following table:
Age Class A Class B Class C Class D
0-4 $.04/lb $.065/lb $.09/lb $.0175/lb
5-8 $.035/lb $.055/lb $.08/lb $.015/lb
9-12 $.03/lb $.05/lb $.07/lb $.0125/lb
13-16 $.025/lb $.025/lb $.025/lb $.01/lb
17-25 $.02/lb $.02/lb $.02/lb $.0075/lb
over 25 $.01/lb $.01/lb $.01/lb $.005/lb
(c) An aircraft owner, who sells an aircraft on which the owner has
paid the tax imposed under this chapter, is entitled to a credit for the
tax paid. The credit equals excise tax paid on the aircraft that was sold,
times the lesser of:
(1) ninety percent (90%); or
(2) ten percent (10%) times the number of months remaining in
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116


the registration year after the sale of the aircraft.
The credit may only be used to reduce the tax imposed under this
chapter on another aircraft purchased by that owner during the
registration year in which the credit accrues. A person may not receive
a refund for a credit under this subsection.
(d) A person who is entitled to a property tax deduction under
IC 6-1.1-12-13 (before its expiration) or IC 6-1.1-12-14 is entitled to
a credit against the tax imposed on the person's aircraft under this
chapter. The credit equals the amount of the property tax deduction to
which the person is entitled under IC 6-1.1-12-13 (before its
expiration) and IC 6-1.1-12-14 minus the amount of that deduction
used to offset the person's property taxes or vehicle excise taxes, times
seven hundredths (.07). The credit may not exceed the amount of the
tax due under this chapter. The county auditor shall, upon the person's
request, furnish a certified statement showing the credit allowable
under this subsection. The department may not allow a credit under this
subsection until the auditor's statement has been filed in the
department's office.
SECTION 18. [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026
(RETROACTIVE)] (a) IC 6-1.1-51.3-5 and IC 6-1.1-51.3-6, both as
added by this act, apply to property taxes imposed for assessment
dates after December 31, 2025.
(b) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
SECTION 19. [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026
(RETROACTIVE)] (a) IC 6-1.1-12-14, as amended by this act,
applies to property taxes for assessment dates after December 31,
2025.
(b) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
SECTION 20. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1187—LS 6750/DI 116